Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.380

Adequate facilities and space required for veterinarians to function.

Public livestock market facilities shall include adequate space and facilities necessary for market, federal, or state veterinarians to properly carry out their functions as prescribed by law and rules adopted under law or as prescribed by applicable federal law or regulation.

[ 2003 c 326 s 84; 1959 c 107 s 38.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.